apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="kata/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- peN- -->
    <pardef n="pengusaha/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulis/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohong/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- pe- -->
    <pardef n="petinju/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabat/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegiat/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- peN- + ber- -->
    <pardef n="pembelajar/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- peN- + se- -->
    <pardef n="penyearah/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- peN- + per- -->
    <pardef n="pemeraga/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- per- -->
    <pardef n="pelajar/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenang/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusak/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- ke-an -->
    <pardef n="kedokteran/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kata"><i>kata</i><par n="kata/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rasa"><i>rasa</i><par n="kata/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="catu"><p><l>pencatu</l><r>catu</r></p><par n="pengusaha/__n" prm="pencatu"/></e>
    <e lm="haru"><p><l>pengharu</l><r>haru</r></p><par n="pengusaha/__n" prm="pengharu"/></e>
    <e lm="kulit"><p><l>pengulit</l><r>kulit</r></p><par n="pengusaha/__n" prm="pengulit"/></e>
    <e lm="sekat"><p><l>penyekat</l><r>sekat</r></p><par n="pengusaha/__n" prm="penyekat"/></e>
    <e lm="dengar"><p><l>pendengar</l><r>dengar</r></p><par n="penulis/__vblex" prm="pendengar"/></e>
    <e lm="kikis"><p><l>pengikis</l><r>kikis</r></p><par n="penulis/__vblex" prm="pengikis"/></e>
    <e lm="siar"><p><l>penyiar</l><r>siar</r></p><par n="penulis/__vblex" prm="penyiar"/></e>
    <e lm="tunjuk"><p><l>penunjuk</l><r>tunjuk</r></p><par n="penulis/__vblex" prm="penunjuk"/></e>
    <e lm="besar"><p><l>pembesar</l><r>besar</r></p><par n="pembohong/__adj" prm="pembesar"/></e>
    <e lm="dingin"><p><l>pendingin</l><r>dingin</r></p><par n="pembohong/__adj" prm="pendingin"/></e>
    <e lm="jernih"><p><l>penjernih</l><r>jernih</r></p><par n="pembohong/__adj" prm="penjernih"/></e>
    <e lm="sehat"><p><l>penyehat</l><r>sehat</r></p><par n="pembohong/__adj" prm="penyehat"/></e>
    <e lm="ladang"><p><l>peladang</l><r>ladang</r></p><par n="petinju/__n" prm="peladang"/></e>
    <e lm="makalah"><p><l>pemakalah</l><r>makalah</r></p><par n="petinju/__n" prm="pemakalah"/></e>
    <e lm="seluncur"><p><l>peseluncur</l><r>seluncur</r></p><par n="petinju/__n" prm="peseluncur"/></e>
    <e lm="zikir"><p><l>pezikir</l><r>zikir</r></p><par n="petinju/__n" prm="pezikir"/></e>
    <e lm="lari"><p><l>pelari</l><r>lari</r></p><par n="pejabat/__vblex" prm="pelari"/></e>
    <e lm="lipat"><p><l>pelipat</l><r>lipat</r></p><par n="pejabat/__vblex" prm="pelipat"/></e>
    <e lm="nyanyi"><p><l>penyanyi</l><r>nyanyi</r></p><par n="pejabat/__vblex" prm="penyanyi"/></e>
    <e lm="ubah"><p><l>peubah</l><r>ubah</r></p><par n="pejabat/__vblex" prm="peubah"/></e>
    <e lm="larut"><p><l>pelarut</l><r>larut</r></p><par n="pegiat/__adj" prm="pelarut"/></e>
    <e lm="lepas"><p><l>pelepas</l><r>lepas</r></p><par n="pegiat/__adj" prm="pelepas"/></e>
    <e lm="macet"><p><l>pemacet</l><r>macet</r></p><par n="pegiat/__adj" prm="pemacet"/></e>
    <e lm="mudah"><p><l>pemudah</l><r>mudah</r></p><par n="pegiat/__adj" prm="pemudah"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>pembelajar</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="pembelajar/__n" prm="pembelajar"/></e>
    <e lm="hasil"><p><l>pemberhasil</l><r>hasil</r></p><par n="pembelajar/__n" prm="pemberhasil"/></e>
    <e lm="arah"><p><l>penyearah</l><r>arah</r></p><par n="penyearah/__n" prm="penyearah"/></e>
    <e lm="contoh"><p><l>pemercontoh</l><r>contoh</r></p><par n="pemeraga/__n" prm="pemercontoh"/></e>
    <e lm="raga"><p><l>pemeraga</l><r>raga</r></p><par n="pemeraga/__n" prm="pemeraga"/></e>
    <e lm="kerja"><p><l>pekerja</l><r>kerja</r></p><par n="pelajar/__n" prm="pekerja"/></e>
    <e lm="rajut"><p><l>perajut</l><r>rajut</r></p><par n="pelajar/__n" prm="perajut"/></e>
    <e lm="rekam"><p><l>perekam</l><r>rekam</r></p><par n="pelajar/__n" prm="perekam"/></e>
    <e lm="runding"><p><l>perunding</l><r>runding</r></p><par n="pelajar/__n" prm="perunding"/></e>
    <e lm="rambat"><p><l>perambat</l><r>rambat</r></p><par n="perenang/__vblex" prm="perambat"/></e>
    <e lm="rawat"><p><l>perawat</l><r>rawat</r></p><par n="perenang/__vblex" prm="perawat"/></e>
    <e lm="tinggal"><p><l>pertinggal</l><r>tinggal</r></p><par n="perenang/__vblex" prm="pertinggal"/></e>
    <e lm="rajin"><p><l>perajin</l><r>rajin</r></p><par n="perusak/__adj" prm="perajin"/></e>
    <e lm="rayu"><p><l>perayu</l><r>rayu</r></p><par n="perusak/__adj" prm="perayu"/></e>
    <e lm="rusak"><p><l>perusak</l><r>rusak</r></p><par n="perusak/__adj" prm="perusak"/></e>
    <e lm="guna"><p><l>kegunaan</l><r>guna</r></p><par n="kedokteran/__n" prm="kegunaan"/></e>
    <e lm="mitra"><p><l>kemitraan</l><r>mitra</r></p><par n="kedokteran/__n" prm="kemitraan"/></e>
    <e lm="senjata"><p><l>kesenjataan</l><r>senjata</r></p><par n="kedokteran/__n" prm="kesenjataan"/></e>
